District of Columbia statutes.
42-2404

Duties of owners and brokers.

The owner and real estate broker shall have in place, at or before settlement, all documents, deeds, titles, recordation tax returns, certified checks, and any other monies needed for settlement so that disbursements can be made in a timely manner.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-187, § 5, 33 DCR 7681
1981 Ed., § 45-2804.